Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1103
Promoting gambling, second degree; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of promoting gambling in the second degree if he or she knowingly advances or profits from any unlawful gambling activity by:

(a) Engaging in bookmaking to the extent that he or she receives or accepts in any one day one or more bets totaling less than one thousand five hundred dollars;

(b) Receiving, in connection with any unlawful gambling scheme or enterprise, less than one thousand five hundred dollars of money played in the scheme or enterprise in any one day; or

(c) Betting something of value in an amount of five hundred dollars or more with one or more persons in one day.

(2) Promoting gambling in the second degree is a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 219;

Laws 1979, LB 152, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 51.